Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-703.03
Elections authorized.

Any future member who has not previously retired prior to July 1, 2004, may elect to make contributions as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of section 24-703 and receive benefits as described in sections 24-707.01 and 24-708. Such election shall be made by written notice delivered to the board not later than ninety days after July 1, 2004.

Laws 2004, LB 1097, § 8.